Utah statutes.
26-28-116.   Sale or purchase of parts prohibited.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), a person that for
valuable consideration, knowingly purchases or sells a part for
transplantation or therapy if removal of a part from an individual is intended
to occur after the individual's death commits a third degree felony.
(2)  A person may charge a reasonable amount for the removal, processing,
preservation, quality control, storage, transportation, implantation, or
disposal of a part.
